italian_verbs.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
		V+
		+Part +Ger +Inf +Imp
        +Ind +Cond +Sub +Pres
		+Pres +Past +AbsPast
		+1Sg +2Sg +3Sg +1Pl +2Pl +3Pl
		+M +F
		@P.CCGG.ARE@ @D.CCGG.ARE@ @R.CCGG.ARE@ ! -are verbs that end with -care,-ccare,-gare or -ggare
		@P.IRREG_IND_PRES.YES@ @D.IRREG_IND_PRES.YES@
		@P.IRREG_ABS_PAST.YES@ @D.IRREG_ABS_PAST.YES@
		@P.IRREG_SUB_PRES.YES@ @D.IRREG_SUB_PRES.YES@
		@P.IRREG_PART.YES@ @D.IRREG_PART.YES@
		
		
		
LEXICON Root
V+:			Verb_Stem ;
V+:   Irregular_Forms ;


LEXICON Verb_Stem 
Verb_Stem_Are ;
Verb_Stem_Ere ;
Verb_Stem_Ire ;
Verb_Stem_Isc ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!										 	       !!
!!   Verb stems of regular and semiregular verbs   !!
!!											       !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Mood_Are
+Ind:0    	Indicative_Are ;
+Cond:0     Conditional_Are ;
+Sub:0		Subjunctive_Are ;
+Imp:0		Imperative_Are ;
+Part:		Participle_Are ;
+Ger:ando							# ;
+Inf:are							# ;


LEXICON Mood_Ere
+Ind:0    	Indicative_Ere ;
+Cond:0     Conditional_Ere ;
+Sub:0		Subjunctive_Ere ;
+Imp:0		Imperative_Ere ;
+Part: 		Participle_Ere_Ire_Isc ;
+Ger:endo					    	# ;
+Inf:ere					    	# ;

LEXICON Mood_Ire
+Ind:    	Indicative_Ire ;
+Cond:    	Conditional_Ire_Isc ;
+Sub:		Subjunctive_Ire ;
+Imp:		Imperative_Ire ;
+Part:    	Participle_Ere_Ire_Isc ;
+Ger:endo					    	# ;
+Inf:ire					    	# ;


LEXICON Mood_Isc
+Ind:    	Indicative_Isc ;
+Cond:     	Conditional_Ire_Isc ;
+Sub:		Subjunctive_Isc ;
+Imp:		Imperative_Isc ;
+Part:    	Participle_Ere_Ire_Isc ;
+Ger:endo					    	# ;
+Inf:ire					    	# ;

			
LEXICON Indicative_Are
+Pres:@D.IRREG_IND_PRES.YES@		Indicative_Present_Are ;
+Past:								Indicative_Imperfect_Are ;
+AbsPast:							Indicative_AbsolutePast_Are ;
+Fut:@D.CCGG.ARE@					Indicative_Future_Are_Ere ;
+Fut:@R.CCGG.ARE@h					Indicative_Future_Are_Ere ;

LEXICON Indicative_Ere
+Pres:@D.IRREG_IND_PRES.YES@		Indicative_Present_Ere ;
+Past:								Indicative_Imperfect_Ere ;
+AbsPast:@D.IRREG_ABS_PAST.YES@		Indicative_AbsolutePast_Ere ;
+Fut:								Indicative_Future_Are_Ere ;

LEXICON Indicative_Ire
+Pres:@D.IRREG_IND_PRES.YES@		Indicative_Present_Ire ;
+Past:								Indicative_Imperfect_Ire_Isc ;
+AbsPast:							Indicative_AbsolutePast_Ire_Isc ;
+Fut:								Indicative_Future_Ire_Isc ;

LEXICON Indicative_Isc
+Pres:								Indicative_Present_Isc ;
+Past:								Indicative_Imperfect_Ire_Isc ;
+AbsPast:							Indicative_AbsolutePast_Ire_Isc ;
+Fut:								Indicative_Future_Ire_Isc ;
		
LEXICON Indicative_Present_Are
+1Sg:o						# ;
+2Sg:@D.CCGG.ARE@i			# ;
+2Sg:@R.CCGG.ARE@hi			# ;
+3Sg:a						# ;
+1Pl:@D.CCGG.ARE@iamo		# ;
+1Pl:@R.CCGG.ARE@hiamo		# ;
+2Pl:ate					# ;
+3Pl:ano					# ;

LEXICON Indicative_Present_Ere
+1Sg:o						# ;
+2Sg:i						# ;
+3Sg:e						# ;
+1Pl:iamo					# ;
+2Pl:ete					# ;
+3Pl:ono					# ;

LEXICON Indicative_Present_Ire
+1Sg:o						# ;
+2Sg:i						# ;
+3Sg:e						# ;
+1Pl:iamo					# ;
+2Pl:ite					# ;
+3Pl:ono					# ;

LEXICON Indicative_Present_Isc
+1Sg:isco					# ;
+2Sg:isci					# ;
+3Sg:isce					# ;
+1Pl:iamo					# ;
+2Pl:ite					# ;
+3Pl:iscono					# ;


LEXICON Indicative_Imperfect_Are
+1Sg:avo					# ;
+2Sg:avi					# ;
+3Sg:ava					# ;
+1Pl:avamo					# ;
+2Pl:avate					# ;
+3Pl:avano					# ;

LEXICON Indicative_Imperfect_Ere
+1Sg:evo					# ;
+2Sg:evi					# ;
+3Sg:eva					# ;
+1Pl:evamo					# ;
+2Pl:evate					# ;
+3Pl:evano					# ;

LEXICON Indicative_Imperfect_Ire_Isc
+1Sg:ivo					# ;
+2Sg:ivi					# ;
+3Sg:iva					# ;
+1Pl:ivamo					# ;
+2Pl:ivate					# ;
+3Pl:ivano					# ;


LEXICON Indicative_AbsolutePast_Are
+1Sg:ai						# ;
+2Sg:asti					# ;
+3Sg:ò						# ;
+1Pl:ammo					# ;
+2Pl:aste					# ;
+3Pl:arono					# ;

LEXICON Indicative_AbsolutePast_Ere
+1Sg:ssi					# ;
+2Sg:esti					# ;
+3Sg:e						# ;
+1Pl:emmo					# ;
+2Pl:este					# ;
+3Pl:erono					# ;

LEXICON Indicative_AbsolutePast_Ire_Isc
+1Sg:iQ						# ;
+2Sg:isti					# ;
+3Sg:ì						# ;
+1Pl:immo					# ;
+2Pl:iste					# ;
+3Pl:irono					# ;

LEXICON Indicative_Future_Are_Ere
+1Sg:erò					# ;
+2Sg:erai					# ;
+3Sg:erà					# ;
+1Pl:eremo					# ;
+2Pl:erete					# ;
+3Pl:eranno					# ;

LEXICON Indicative_Future_Ire_Isc
+1Sg:irò					# ;
+2Sg:irai					# ;
+3Sg:irà					# ;
+1Pl:iremo					# ;
+2Pl:irete					# ;
+3Pl:iranno				# ;


LEXICON Conditional_Are
+Pres:@D.CCGG.ARE@		Conditional_Present_Are_Ere ;
+Pres:@R.CCGG.ARE@h		Conditional_Present_Are_Ere ;

LEXICON Conditional_Ere
+Pres:					Conditional_Present_Are_Ere ;

LEXICON Conditional_Ire_Isc
+Pres:				Conditional_Present_Ire_Isc ;


LEXICON Conditional_Present_Are_Ere
+1Sg:erei		# ;
+2Sg:eresti		# ;
+3Sg:erebbe		# ;
+1Pl:eremmo		# ;
+2Pl:ereste		# ;
+3Pl:erebbero	# ;

LEXICON Conditional_Present_Ire_Isc
+1Sg:irei		# ;
+2Sg:iresti		# ;
+3Sg:irebbe		# ;
+1Pl:iremmo		# ;
+2Pl:ireste		# ;
+3Pl:irebbero	# ;


LEXICON Subjunctive_Are
+Pres:@D.IRREG_SUB_PRES.YES@@D.CCGG.ARE@		Subjunctive_Present_Are ;
+Pres:@R.CCGG.ARE@h								Subjunctive_Present_Are ;
+Past:										 Subjunctive_Imperfect_Are ;

LEXICON Subjunctive_Ere
+Pres:@D.IRREG_SUB_PRES.YES@		Subjunctive_Present_Ere_Ire ;
+Past:							 Subjunctive_Imperfect_Ere ;

LEXICON Subjunctive_Ire
+Pres:@D.IRREG_SUB_PRES.YES@		Subjunctive_Present_Ere_Ire ;
+Past:						 Subjunctive_Imperfect_Ire_Isc ;

LEXICON Subjunctive_Isc
+Pres:@D.IRREG_SUB_PRES.YES@		Subjunctive_Present_Isc ;
+Past:						 Subjunctive_Imperfect_Ire_Isc ;


LEXICON Subjunctive_Present_Are
+1Sg:i			# ;
+2Sg:i			# ;
+3Sg:i			# ;
+1Pl:iamo		# ;
+2Pl:iate		# ;
+3Pl:ino		# ;

LEXICON Subjunctive_Present_Ere_Ire
+1Sg:a			# ;
+2Sg:a			# ;
+3Sg:a			# ;
+1Pl:iamo		# ;
+2Pl:iate		# ;
+3Pl:ano		# ;

LEXICON Subjunctive_Present_Isc
+1Sg:isca		# ;
+2Sg:isca		# ;
+3Sg:isca		# ;
+1Pl:iamo		# ;
+2Pl:iate		# ;
+3Pl:iscano		# ;


LEXICON Subjunctive_Imperfect_Are
+1Sg:assi		# ;
+2Sg:assi		# ;
+3Sg:asse		# ;
+1Pl:assimo		# ;
+2Pl:aste		# ;
+3Pl:assero		# ;

LEXICON Subjunctive_Imperfect_Ere
+1Sg:essi		# ;
+2Sg:essi		# ;
+3Sg:esse		# ;
+1Pl:essimo		# ;
+2Pl:este		# ;
+3Pl:essero		# ;

LEXICON Subjunctive_Imperfect_Ire_Isc
+1Sg:issi		# ;
+2Sg:issi		# ;
+3Sg:isse		# ;
+1Pl:issimo		# ;
+2Pl:iste		# ;
+3Pl:issero		# ;


LEXICON Imperative_Are
+2Sg:a			# ;
+3Sg:i			# ;
+1Pl:iamo		# ;
+2Pl:ate		# ;
+3Pl:ino		# ;

LEXICON Imperative_Ere
+2Sg:i			# ;
+3Sg:a			# ;
+1Pl:iamo		# ;
+2Pl:ete		# ;
+3Pl:ano		# ;

LEXICON Imperative_Ire
+2Sg:i			# ;
+3Sg:a			# ;
+1Pl:iamo		# ;
+2Pl:ite		# ;
+3Pl:ano		# ;

LEXICON Imperative_Isc
+2Sg:isci		# ;
+3Sg:isca		# ;
+1Pl:iamo		# ;
+2Pl:ite		# ;
+3Pl:iscano		# ;


LEXICON Participle_Are
+Pres:							Participle_Present_GenderNum_Are ;
+Past:@D.IRREG_PART.YES@		Participle_Past_GenderNum_Are ;

LEXICON Participle_Ere_Ire_Isc
+Pres:							Participle_Present_GenderNum_Ere_Ire_Isc ;
+Past:@D.IRREG_PART.YES@		Participle_Past_GenderNum_Ere_Ire_Isc ;


LEXICON Participle_Present_GenderNum_Are
+Sg+M:ante		# ;
+Sg+F:ante		# ;
+Pl+F:anti		# ;
+Pl+M:anti		# ;

LEXICON Participle_Present_GenderNum_Ere_Ire_Isc
+Sg+M:ente		# ;
+Sg+F:ente		# ;
+Pl+F:enti		# ;
+Pl+M:enti		# ;

LEXICON Participle_Past_GenderNum_Are
+Sg+M:ato		# ;
+Sg+F:ata		# ;
+Pl+M:ati		# ;
+Pl+F:ate		# ;

LEXICON Participle_Past_GenderNum_Ere_Ire_Isc
+Sg+M:uto		# ;
+Sg+F:uta		# ;
+Pl+M:uti		# ;
+Pl+F:ute		# ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!										  !!
!! Irregular verb stems and their endings !!
!!										  !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


LEXICON Irregular_Forms
Highly_Irregular_Forms ;
Irregular_Indicative_Present ;
Irregular_AbsolutePast ;
Irregular_Subjunctive_Present ;
Irregular_Participle ;

LEXICON Highly_Irregular_Forms
Highly_Irregular_Forms_Are ;
Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere ;
Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ire ;
Highly_Irregular_Forms_Isc ;

LEXICON Irregular_Indicative_Present
Irregular_Indicative_Present_Are ;
Irregular_Indicative_Present_Ere ;
Irregular_Indicative_Present_Ire ;
Irregular_Indicative_Present_Isc ;

LEXICON Verb_Stem_Are
additare:addit           Mood_Are ;
allettare:allett           Mood_Are ;
appigliare:appigli           Mood_Are ;
attorcigliare:attorcigli           Mood_Are ;
bagnare:bagn           Mood_Are ;
cabrare:cabr           Mood_Are ;
chinare:chin           Mood_Are ;
concatenare:concaten           Mood_Are ;
demonetizzare:demonetizz           Mood_Are ;
dondolare:dondol           Mood_Are ;
fruttificare:fruttific@P.CCGG.ARE@           Mood_Are ;
inalveare:inalve           Mood_Are ;
intronare:intron           Mood_Are ;
monetizzare:monetizz           Mood_Are ;
piagnucolare:piagnucol           Mood_Are ;
rallegrare:rallegr           Mood_Are ;
rimaneggiare:rimaneggi           Mood_Are ;
sbalestrare:sbalestr           Mood_Are ;
sdegnare:sdegn           Mood_Are ;
somigliare:somigli           Mood_Are ;
stramazzare:stramazz           Mood_Are ;
trasmodare:trasmod           Mood_Are ;
LEXICON Verb_Stem_Ere
affliggere:affligg           Mood_Ere ;
assidere:assid           Mood_Ere ;
autodirigere:autodirig           Mood_Ere ;
avvolgere:avvolg           Mood_Ere ;
comprimere:comprim           Mood_Ere ;
convivere:conviv           Mood_Ere ;
detergere:deterg           Mood_Ere ;
distendere:distend           Mood_Ere ;
espandere:espand           Mood_Ere ;
godere:god           Mood_Ere ;
intercedere:interced           Mood_Ere ;
mescere:mesc           Mood_Ere ;
piangere:piang           Mood_Ere ;
proludere:prolud@P.IRREG_ABS_PAST.YES@@P.IRREG_PART.YES@          Mood_Ere ;
reggere:regg           Mood_Ere ;
ricuocere:ricuoc           Mood_Ere ;
ripiovere:ripiov           Mood_Ere ;
rompere:romp           Mood_Ere ;
soffriggere:soffrigg           Mood_Ere ;
spiacere:spiac           Mood_Ere ;
temere:tem           Mood_Ere ;
vivere:viv           Mood_Ere ;
LEXICON Verb_Stem_Ire
addormire:addorm           Mood_Ire ;
apparire:appar           Mood_Ire ;
assentire:assent           Mood_Ire ;
autoconferire:autoconfer           Mood_Ire ;
bramire:bram           Mood_Ire ;
conseguire:consegu           Mood_Ire ;
coprire:copr           Mood_Ire ;
disparire:dispar           Mood_Ire ;
dormire:dorm           Mood_Ire ;
fuoriuscire:fuoriusc@P.IRREG_IND_PRES.YES@@P.IRREG_SUB_PRES.YES@           Mood_Ire ;
gualcire:gualc           Mood_Ire ;
inferocire:inferoc           Mood_Ire ;
invertire:invert           Mood_Ire ;
martire:mart           Mood_Ire ;
partire:part           Mood_Ire ;
plaudire:plaud           Mood_Ire ;
rattrappire:rattrapp           Mood_Ire ;
ricomparire:ricompar           Mood_Ire ;
ripentire:ripent           Mood_Ire ;
scoprire:scopr           Mood_Ire ;
sovvertire:sovvert           Mood_Ire ;
udire:ud           Mood_Ire ;
uscire:usc@P.IRREG_IND_PRES.YES@@P.IRREG_SUB_PRES.YES@           Mood_Ire ;
LEXICON Verb_Stem_Isc
affiochire:affioch           Mood_Isc ;
ammuffire:ammuff           Mood_Isc ;
arrugginire:arruggin           Mood_Isc ;
autoinorgoglire:autoinorgogl           Mood_Isc ;
campire:camp           Mood_Isc ;
confluire:conflu           Mood_Isc ;
dimagrire:dimagr           Mood_Isc ;
esordire:esord           Mood_Isc ;
gestire:gest           Mood_Isc ;
imbellire:imbell           Mood_Isc ;
impaurire:impaur           Mood_Isc ;
inacetire:inacet           Mood_Isc ;
incrudelire:incrudel           Mood_Isc ;
influire:influ           Mood_Isc ;
intiepidire:intiepid           Mood_Isc ;
muggire:mugg           Mood_Isc ;
recensire:recens           Mood_Isc ;
ringiovanire:ringiovan           Mood_Isc ;
schiarire:schiar           Mood_Isc ;
spedire:sped           Mood_Isc ;
zittire:zitt           Mood_Isc ;
LEXICON Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere
avere+Ind+Past:av	Indicative_Imperfect_Ere ;
avere+Part:av			Participle_Ere_Ire_Isc ;
sapere+Ind+Past:sapp	Indicative_Imperfect_Ere ;
sapere+Part:sap			Participle_Ere_Ire_Isc ;
potere+Ind+Past:po	Indicative_Imperfect_Ere ;
potere+Sub+Pres:poss	 	Subjunctive_Present_Ere_Ire ;
potere+Sub+Past:pot		   Subjunctive_Imperfect_Ere ;
potere+Part:pot			Participle_Ere_Ire_Isc ;
essere+Part:st			Participle_Ere_Ire_Isc ;
volere+Ind+Past:vol		Indicative_Imperfect_Ere ;
volere+Sub+Past:vogli  Subjunctive_Present_Ere_Ire ;
volere+Sub+Past:vol  Subjunctive_Imperfect_Ere ;
volere+Part:vol			Participle_Ere_Ire_Isc ;
